Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 1. Parentage; Paternity Actions

Cross references. —

As to adoption, see chapter 22 of title 1.

Illegitimacy proceedings statutorily based. —

Illegitimacy or filiation proceedings are purely creation of statute since in common law an illegitimate child is considered the child of no one. Vigil v. Tafoya, 600 P.2d 721,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1979).

Chapter only statutory authority for determination of paternity.—

There is no common-law authority for the determination of paternity, and in this jurisdiction the only statutory authority therefor is found in this chapter. Blanton v. Warn, 444 P.2d 325,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1968).

Provisions authorizing parentage proceedings to be carefullyand strictly followed. —

Since common law gave a putative father no right of action but this article does give him a cause of action which permits him to establish the parent-child relationship, the sections which authorize the proceedings in such matters must be carefully and strictly followed in order to give effect to the intention of the legislature. In re TRG, 665 P.2d 491,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1983).

Parties. —

An agency cannot bring an action and then claim it is not a party. Department of family services (DFS) initiated the action, participated and exercised control over the proceedings, and was a real party in interest who stood to benefit from identifying the father; just because DFS was required by statute to bring this action is irrelevant to whether the agency is a party. Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994).

Paternity determinations made in divorce actions not subjectto provisions. —

The rules under this article do not apply where paternity of a child presumed to be a child of the marriage is determined by consent of the parties in a proceeding to modify a divorce decree to include a child conceived during the marriage but born afterward. CSP v. DDC, 842 P.2d 528,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1992).

Termination of parental rights in adoption proceedings. —

In an adoption proceeding, the provisions regarding termination of parental rights found in the adoption statutes (§

1-22-101

et seq.) control over the more general provisions for the termination of parental rights found in this article. GWJ v. MH (In re BGH), 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

41 Am. Jur. 2d Illegitimate Children § 1 et seq.

Mother's right to custody of illegitimate child, 98 ALR2d 417.

Right of putative father to visit illegitimate child, 15 ALR3d 887.

Discrimination on basis of illegitimacy as denial of constitutional rights, 38 ALR3d 613.

Right of putative father to custody of illegitimate child, 45 ALR3d 216.

Term “children” as used in beneficiary clause of life insurance policy as including illegitimate child, 62 ALR3d 1329.

Effect, in subsequent proceedings, of paternity findings or implications in divorce or annulment decree or in support or custody order made incidental thereto, 78 ALR3d 846.

Legitimation by marriage to natural father of child born during mother's marriage to another, 80 ALR3d 219.

Determination of paternity of child as within scope of proceeding under Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, 81 ALR3d 1175.

Validity and construction of surrogate parenting agreement, 77 ALR4th 70.

Rights of unwed father to obstruct adoption of his child by withholding consent, 61 ALR5th 151.

14 C.J.S. Children out of Wedlock § 1 et seq.

§§ 14-2-101 through 14-2-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1957, §§ 14-59.2 to 14-59.23, related to parentage and paternity actions. For present law, see Title 14, chapter 2, articles 4 through 9.